Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3893
(UTC 1004) Attorney's fees and costs.

(UTC 1004) In a judicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the court, as justice and equity may require, may award costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, to any party, to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the controversy.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 93.

An accounting is ordinarily an appropriate remedy for a breach of trustee’s duty to inform and report on a trust and its administration. In re Rolf H. Brennemann Testamentary Trust, 288 Neb. 389, 849 N.W.2d 458 (2014).

The county court had the authority to consider an award of attorney fees in an action for an accounting where the trustees had breached their duty to inform and report to the beneficiary on the trust and its administration, even if the breach was harmless. In re Rolf H. Brennemann Testamentary Trust, 288 Neb. 389, 849 N.W.2d 458 (2014).

Whether attorney fees and expenses are awarded is addressed to the discretion of the trial court. In re Trust of Rosenberg, 273 Neb. 59, 727 N.W.2d 430 (2007).